Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-6,116
Enforcement; rules and regulations.

The department shall enforce the Compressed Fuel Tax Act and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the act. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the act.

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 20.